Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CITY OF MAPLEWOOD.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of Maplewood to develop, in cooperation with the new owner and HmongTown Connection, the former Sears department store site at the Maplewood Mall as a community and cultural marketplace. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end